Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.670

Human immunodeficiency virus insurance program.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) "Human immunodeficiency virus insurance program," as used in this section, means a program that provides health insurance coverage for individuals with human immunodeficiency virus, as defined in RCW 70.24.017(7), who are not eligible for medical assistance programs from the health care authority as defined in *RCW 74.09.010(10) and meet eligibility requirements established by the department of health.

(2) The department of health may pay for health insurance coverage on behalf of persons with human immunodeficiency virus, who meet department eligibility requirements, and who are eligible for "continuation coverage" as provided by the federal consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1985, group health insurance policies, or individual policies.

[2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 72; 2007 c 259 s 38; 2003 c 274 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 74.09.010 was amended by 2011 c 316 s 2, changing subsection (10) to subsection (11). RCW 74.09.010 was subsequently amended by 2013 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 8, changing subsection (10) to subsection (13). RCW 74.09.010 was subsequently amended by 2017 c 226 s 5, changing subsection (13) to subsection (14).

Effective date—Findings—Intent—Report—Agency transfer—References to head of health care authority—Draft legislation—2011 1st sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 74.09.010.

Subheadings not law—2007 c 259: See note following RCW 7.70.060.

Rules—2003 c 274: "The department of health shall adopt rules to implement this act." [2003 c 274 s 3.]

Effective date—2003 c 274: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2003." [2003 c 274 s 4.]